Florida, session 2026, SB7040.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âThe Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund 28 within the Executive Office of the Governor, which terminated 29 pursuant to s. 19(f), Article III of the State Constitution on 30 February 17, 2026, is re-created within the Executive Office of 31 the Governor. 32 Section 2.âSection 252.3711, Florida Statutes, is amended 33 to read: 34 252.3711âEmergency Preparedness and Response Fund.â 35 (1)âThe Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund is created 36 within the Executive Office of the Governor. 37 (2)âThe fund is established for use as a depository for 38 moneys specifically transferred or appropriated to the fund by 39 the Legislature or pursuant to s. 11.90. The moneys deposited in 40 the fund are available as a primary funding source for the 41 Governor for purposes of preparing or responding to a disaster 42 declared by the Governor as a state of emergency that exceeds 43 regularly appropriated funding sources. 44 (a)âMoneys in the fund may be used for a natural emergency. 45 If such state of emergency has been renewed pursuant to s. 46 252.36, budget amendments must be submitted in accordance with 47 the notice, review, and objection procedures set forth in s. 48 216.177, notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292. 49 (b)âMoneys in the fund may be used for a state of emergency 50 that is a manmade emergency or a technological emergency. If 51 such state of emergency has been renewed pursuant to s. 252.36, 52 budget amendments must be submitted in accordance with the 53 notice, review, and objection procedures set forth in s. 54 216.177. However, the chair and the vice chair of the 55 Legislative Budget Commission may authorize such amendment to be 56 approved pursuant to s. 216.177. 57 (c)âFederal reimbursements of state emergency expenditures 58 shall be deposited in a separate account within the fund. 59 Expenditures from this separate account may only be made for 60 invoices that were incurred before the deposit of the federal 61 reimbursement and may not be used for any other purpose until 62 all outstanding prior invoices have been paid. 63 (d)âMoneys in the fund may not be used to purchase 64 aircraft, boats, or motor vehicles; however, nothing in this 65 paragraph shall prohibit the short-term lease of aircraft, 66 boats, or motor vehicles for responding to an emergency. 67 (3)âIn accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State 68 Constitution, The Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund 69 shall, unless terminated sooner, be terminated July 1, 2028 4 70 years after the effective date of this act. Before its scheduled 71 termination, the fund shall be reviewed as provided in s. 72 215.3208 s. 215.3206(1) and (2). 73 (4)âBeginning July 15, 2026, and on or before the 15th day 74 of the month following each quarter, the Division of Emergency 75 Management shall submit a report to the President of the Senate 76 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives which includes 77 all of the following: 78 (a)âThe projected year-end cash balance of the fund. 79 (b)âAn updated cash flow statement for that fiscal year. 80 (c)âAn update on all pending and received federal 81 reimbursements. 82 (d)âAn accounting of all inventory and assets purchased, 83 itemized by emergency event and agency, for preparing for, 84 responding to, or recovering from a state of emergency and the 85 current status of such assets. 86 (e)âAn accounting of all pending invoices, itemized by 87 emergency event and agency, including the date the invoice was 88 received. 89 Section 3.âThis act shall operate retroactively to February 90 17, 2026. 91 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.